Maine, session 132, LD582.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4320-W is enacted to read:
§4320-W. Coverage for blood testing for PFAS
1. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
"perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" means any member of the class
of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.
2. Required coverage. A carrier offering a health plan in this State shall provide
coverage for blood testing for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances that is
recommended by a provider as medically necessary health care for an enrollee. For the
purposes of this subsection, blood testing for PFAS is presumed to be medically necessary
health care for an enrollee if a provider determines that the enrollee meets clinical
guidelines for blood testing for PFAS established by the National Academies of Sciences,
Engineering, and Medicine, its successor organization or a comparable organization.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to all policies, contracts and certificates
executed, delivered, issued for delivery, continued or renewed in this State on or after
January 1, 2027. For purposes of this Act, all contracts are deemed to be renewed no later
than the next yearly anniversary of the contract date.
Sec. 3. Exemption from mandate review. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 24-A, section 2752, this Act is enacted without review and evaluation by the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation, Bureau of Insurance.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
State Benefit Mandate Defrayal Z373
Page 1 - 132LR0980(03)

Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the cost of the benefit mandate providing coverage
of blood testing for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, beginning January 1,
2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $90,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $90,000
Page 2 - 132LR0980(03)